Utah statutes.
19-6-409.   Petroleum Storage Tank Trust Fund created -- Source of revenues.
(1) (a)  There is created a private-purpose trust fund entitled the "Petroleum
Storage Tank Trust Fund."
(b)  The sole sources of revenues for the fund are:
(i)  petroleum storage tank fees under Section 19-6-411;
(ii)  underground storage tank installation company permit fees under Section
19-6-411;
(iii)  the environmental assurance fee and any penalties, paid under Section
19-6-410.5; and
(iv) any interest accrued on these revenues.
(c)  Interest earned on fund monies shall be deposited into the fund.
(2)  Fund monies may be used to pay:
(a)  costs as provided in Section 19-6-419; and
(b)  for the administration of the fund and the environmental assurance
program and fee under Section 19-6-410.5.
(3)  Costs for the administration of the fund and the environmental assurance
fee shall be appropriated by the Legislature.
(4)  The executive secretary may expend monies from the fund for:
(a)  legal and claims adjusting costs incurred by the state in connection with
claims, judgments, awards, or settlements for bodily injury or property damage
to third parties;
(b)  costs incurred by the state risk manager in determining the actuarial
soundness of the fund; and
(c)  other costs as provided in this part.
